Utah statutes.
62A-4a-301.   Legislative finding.

The Legislature finds that there is a need to assist private and public agencies in identifying and establishing community-based education, service, and treatment programs to prevent the occurrence and recurrence of abuse and neglect.

It is the purpose of this part to provide a means to increase prevention and treatment programs designed to reduce the occurrence or recurrence of child abuse and neglect.

